Utah statutes.
58-40-305.   Exemptions from licensure.

In addition to the exemptions from licensure in Section 58-1-307, a person may conduct or participate in a recreational activity without being licensed under this chapter if the person is using the recreational activity for the sole outcome of the recreational experience and is not using recreational activity as a therapeutic intervention following the therapeutic recreation process.



Enacted by Chapter 82, 2012 General Session

